Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5611.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 37-8 of the General Laws entitled "Public Buildings" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
37-8-21. Universal changing stations required in public buildings.
(a) The department of administration shall, by January 1, 2026, adopt regulations requiring
any public building that is newly constructed, reconstructed or remodeled on or after January 1,
2027 to install and maintain at least one universal changing station.
(b) The regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this section shall include the
following:
(1) A requirement that the entrance to each universal changing station has conspicuous
signage indicating the location of the station;
(2) A requirement that if a public building has a central directory, said central directory
shall indicate the location of the universal changing station; and
(3) A requirement that all universal changing stations shall:
(i) Be capable of supporting up to three hundred fifty pounds (350 lbs.);
(ii) Be equipped with a height-adjustable changing table;
(iii) Be located inside a private restroom or in a private stall, enclosed area or privacy screen
within a multi-stall restroom;
(iv) Provide adequate space for assistance; and
(v) Comply with all requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act.

(c) The department may grant an exemption from the requirements of this section if it
determines:
(1) The installation would not be feasible;
(2) The installation would result in a failure to comply with the Americans with Disabilities
Act standards for access for persons with disabilities;
(3) The cost of the proposed reconstruction or remodeling without the inclusion of the
changing table does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000);
(4) The installation would destroy the historic significance of a historic property; or
(5) The building is not frequented by the public.
(d) For the purposes of this chapter “universal changing station,” means a changing station
within an enclosed restroom facility that is for use by persons of any age who require assistance
with diapering and is accessible by persons of any sex.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001793
========
LC001793 - Page 2 of 3